Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 16. Voluntary Remediation of Contaminated Sites

§ 35-11-1601.
Applicability; nonvoluntary remediation.

This article establishes the requirements and procedures necessary for voluntary remediation of eligible sites under this act, and shall not authorize unpermitted releases of contaminants to the environment of the state. Consistent with the policy and purpose of this act, this article shall provide incentive to remediate eligible sites and establish criteria for application of site-specific, risk-based remediation. All voluntary remediation requirements for eligible sites shall be performed in accordance with this article and shall be contained in a remedy agreement issued under W.S.

35-11-1607

. Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, no additional remediation requirements may be imposed by the department under this act for remediation of any site subject to a remedy agreement issued under W.S.

35-11-1607

, unless the remedy agreement has been reopened or terminated under W.S.

35-11-1610

. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the imposition of remediation requirements to address the release of a contaminant which may occur after a remedy agreement has been entered into or a no further action letter has been issued. Remediation authorized by the department under this article shall not be deemed a prohibited act under this act, or of any rules or regulations promulgated thereunder.

Remediation is not voluntary under this article if it is required:

By order of the department, council or by any court and entered without the consent of a person; or

By order of the department, council or by any court and entered without the consent of a person who has failed or refused to enter into, or breached the terms of, a preliminary remediation agreement, remedy agreement or reopened remedy agreement; or

By administrative or judicial order to which the United States environmental protection agency is a party, which is issued after the effective date of this act, on a site that has been determined not to be eligible under W.S.

35-11-1603

.

Sites that are not eligible for voluntary remediation are subject to all other applicable requirements of this act, including the provisions of W.S.

35-11-1613

.

Nothing herein shall relieve owners or operators of eligible sites from applicable permit requirements under this act or limit the director’s ability to undertake enforcement action relating to a complaint under article 7 of this act [§

35-11-701

] and impose a penalty for violation of the act under article 9 of this act [§

35-11-901

et seq.].

Nothing in this article shall limit the director’s authority to order any person to abate any condition that poses an imminent or substantial endangerment to human health or the environment, or the director’s authority to issue emergency orders under W.S.

35-11-115

.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 13, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

§ 35-11-1602.
Eligibility for voluntary remediation program; sites eligible; sites ineligible.

Eligible sites shall include sites which meet the following conditions:

Sites, or portions of sites, where releases occurred before the effective date of this article and:

The site, or portion of site, where the release occurred was not subject to the permit requirements of this act at the time of the release; or

The site is covered by an order of the department, council or by any court and entered with the consent of the person or entity.

Sites, or portions of sites, where releases occurred on or after the effective date of this article and where the owner or operator is implementing a pollution prevention plan consistent with rules promulgated under this act;

Waste management or disposal units that have been permitted under this act and the director determines that the release from the permitted unit, if restricted or prohibited by the permit, cannot be remediated in accord with the permit requirements because of technical impracticability.

Eligible sites shall not include:

A site for which remediation is not voluntary under W.S. 35-11-1601(b);

A site that is listed on the National Priorities List of Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act (CERCLA), 42 U.S.C. §§ 9601-9675;

A commercial solid waste management facility, commercial waste incineration or disposal facility subject to W.S.

35-11-514

;

Underground and aboveground storage tanks subject to article 14 of this act [§

35-11-1401

et seq.];

Radioactive waste storage facilities subject to article 15 of this act [§

35-11-1501

et seq.];

Abandoned mine land sites subject to article 12 of this act [§

35-11-1201

et seq.]; or

Any site where a release resulted from continuous or repeated violations of any law, rule, regulation or order under this act.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 13, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

§ 35-11-1603.
Participation in the voluntary remediation program; application; time for determination.

To participate in the voluntary remediation program a person must submit an application to the department that identifies the owner and provides a location and description of the site. The application shall also describe the site-specific conditions which the applicant believes satisfy one (1) or more of the eligibility criteria of W.S.

35-11-1602

. No later than forty-five (45) days after receipt of the application, the department shall give written notice to the applicant containing the department’s determination of the site eligibility for participation in the voluntary remediation program.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 13, § 1.

§ 35-11-1604.
Public participation; notice; plan.

Following any determination by the department that a site is an eligible site, or following the submission of any application to modify an existing remedy agreement, the owner or operator shall give written notice to all surface owners of record of land which is contiguous to the site, and to all known adjacent surface owners of record of land, and shall publish notice once per week for four (4) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the site is located. The notice published in a newspaper shall be a display advertisement. The notice to individual landowners and the notice published in a newspaper shall identify the site, provide a summary of the criterion in W.S.

35-11-1602

which makes the site eligible for participation in the voluntary remediation program under this article, describe the process for the public to request the development of a public participation plan under subsection (b) of this section, and provide a thirty (30) day period for the public to request that a public participation plan be developed.

For any eligible site where there is significant public interest as determined by the director after considering the factors enumerated in paragraphs (i) through (iii) of this subsection, the person who has submitted an application for participation, or the owner of the site, shall prepare and implement a public participation plan which shall be approved by the director. In preparing the plan, the applicant or owner shall consult with and consider the public participation needs of interested parties, including but not limited to contiguous surface owners of record and all known adjacent surface owners of record of land, local government, local economic development agencies or groups, and public interest groups. In determining whether there is significant public interest, the director shall consider whether there have been responses to the notice required under subsection (a) of this section requesting the development of a public participation plan by:

At least twenty-five (25) individuals;

An organization representing at least twenty-five (25) individuals; or

The governing body of a local government.

Any owner or operator of an eligible site which is also subject to permitting or corrective action requirements of the hazardous waste rules and regulations promulgated under W.S. 35-11-503(d) shall prepare and implement a public participation plan which complies with those rules and regulations.

At a minimum for any eligible site regardless of whether a public participation plan has been required, prior to entering into a remedy agreement, the owner shall give written notice of the proposed remedy agreement to all surface owners of record of land adjacent to the site, and publish notice once per week for four (4) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the site is located. The notice shall be of a form and content prescribed by the department, and shall summarize the proposed remedy agreement, provide a description of the site, provide for a thirty (30) day public comment period after the date of the last publication, and provide an opportunity for an oral hearing. An oral hearing on the proposed remedy agreement shall be held if the department finds sufficient interest. The department may enter into a remedy agreement following the public comment period or any hearing, whichever is later.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 13, § 1.

§ 35-11-1605.
Voluntary remediation standards; site-specific, risk-based standards; considerations in choice of remedy; alternate standards for soil; alternate standards for soil or water; point of compliance; contamination from source not on site; alternate remediation standards for site contaminated from source not on site; supplemental requirements.

Consistent with any requirements necessary to retain state primacy in federal programs, any remedy proposed by an owner of an eligible site, or considered by the director, shall:

Be protective of human health, safety and the environment. A remedy shall be considered to be protective of human health if it reduces risk to human receptors of acute and chronic toxic exposures to contaminants to levels that do not pose a significant risk to human health. A remedy shall be considered to be protective of the environment if it adequately reduces risk of significant adverse impacts to ecological receptors for which habitats have been identified on or near the site. Remedies may meet this requirement through a combination of monitored natural attenuation, removal, treatment, or engineering or institutional controls. Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, any site where a remedy is proposed that includes engineering or institutional controls must also have been designated as a use control area in accord with W.S.

35-11-1609

;

Attain standards established by the director under this subsection for air, soil, and water affected by the site, unless the director sets an alternate standard in accord with subsection (c) or (d) of this section. No standard set under this section for a contaminant shall be set at a level or concentration lower than the background level or concentration for that contaminant. A remedy must attain standards or alternate standards by the end of the remediation period set forth in the remedy agreement. A remedy shall be considered to attain standards for air, soil and water if it:

Meets any applicable media standards established under federal or state law or rule or regulation; or

Meets site-specific, risk-based standards developed for the eligible site. Site-specific, risk-based standards shall establish a risk reduction goal for contaminants which are known or suspected carcinogens to ensure that the excess upper bound lifetime cancer risk to any exposed individual may not exceed a probability of developing cancer of one in one million (1 in 1,000,000) to one in ten thousand (1 in 10,000). The one in one million (1 in 1,000,000) risk level shall be used as the point of departure for determining remediation goals for alternatives when individual contaminant standards are not available, or are not sufficiently protective because of the presence of multiple contaminants at a site or multiple pathways of exposures. Site-specific, risk-based standards must also require that for contaminants which are systemic toxicants, the hazard index must not exceed one (1). The director shall use residential exposure factors, giving consideration to children and the elderly, to establish site-specific, risk-based standards under this subsection for soils and air. The exposure factors to be used by the director to establish site-specific, risk-based standards under this subsection for hazardous substances in groundwater shall assume that groundwater may be used as a drinking water source, provided that no standard set under this subsection for a contaminant shall be set at a level or concentration lower than the background level or concentration for that contaminant. For nonhazardous substances, the exposure factors to be used by the director shall assume uses consistent with the class of use prior to contamination of the groundwater.

Control any sources of releases so as to reduce or eliminate, to the extent technically practicable, further releases as required to protect human health and the environment. A remedy shall be considered to control sources of releases if it controls the release of contaminants from sources to any media in concentrations that exceed applicable standards set by the director under paragraph (a)(ii) of this section, or the soil standards under subsection (c) or (d) of this section; and

Comply with any applicable standard for management of wastes generated as a consequence of the remedy. A remedy shall be considered to comply with applicable standards for management of wastes if all wastes generated as a consequence of implementation of the remedy are treated, stored or disposed of in compliance with the requirements of this act.

The director shall choose a remedy, or combination of remedies, from among those remedies which meet the requirements of subsection (a), (c) or (d) of this section, as applicable. In choosing a remedy, the director shall consider:

The extent to which the remedy will be reliable and effective for the long term. For remedies that include engineering or institutional controls in accord with a use control area designation, the director shall consider the expected life cycle performance of any engineering controls, monitoring systems and institutional controls;

The extent to which the remedy results in a reduction of toxicity, mobility or volume of contaminants. The director shall consider the degree to which remedies incorporate treatment or removal of contaminants to lower long term risk to human health and the environment;

The short term effectiveness of the remedy. The director shall consider the time required for each remedy to attain standards for air, soil and water specified in paragraph (a)(ii) or subsection (c) or (d) of this section, as applicable. A remedy involving monitored natural attenuation may be considered whether or not the director has made a determination of technical impracticability under subsection (d) of this section. Monitored natural attenuation shall be deemed effective if there is evidence that natural attenuation is occurring and will be completed within a reasonable time period;

Impacts which may be caused by implementation of the remedy. The director shall consider any adverse impacts which may be caused by a remedy, and shall take into consideration the gravity of any projected impact and the cost and availability of measures to mitigate the impact;

The extent and nature of contamination and practicable capabilities of remedial technologies, and whether achieving standards is technically impracticable;

Reasonably anticipated future land uses or use restrictions in a use control area designation;

Consistency of remedies with the nature and complexities of releases of contaminants; and

Cost of the remedy. The director shall consider whether a remedy presents a substantial and disproportionately high cost for implementation and completion. The director shall compare the costs of remedies considering the degree of risk reduction that is afforded by each remedy. Costs considered shall include capital, operation and maintenance, engineering and institutional control costs and monitoring costs for the anticipated life of the remedy.

The director may establish alternate site-specific, risk-based standards for surface and subsurface soils to be employed at a site in lieu of the soil standards in paragraph (a)(ii) of this section, for any site that is located within a use control area designated under W.S.

35-11-1609

. A remedy that employs alternate standards established by the director under this subsection shall meet the requirements of this subsection and paragraphs (a)(i), (iii) and (iv) of this section. The alternate standards for such a site shall use the carcinogenic and systemic toxicant risk reduction goals of subparagraph (a)(ii)(B) of this section, except that the exposure assumptions used to calculate the alternate standards under this subsection shall be consistent with the use restrictions contained in the use control area designation. If the director establishes alternate soil standards under this subsection, the owner or operator must evaluate technologies that can meet the alternate soil standards. Owners or operators of eligible sites that implement remedies which achieve the alternate soil standards set under this subsection may be issued a certificate of completion and covenant not to sue pursuant to W.S.

35-11-1607

. The soil standards of paragraph (a)(ii) of this section must be met if the owner or operator applies to remove the use restrictions applicable to the site or to receive a no further action letter under W.S.

35-11-1608

.

The director may establish alternate site-specific, risk-based standards for soil or water to be employed at a site in lieu of the soil and water standards in paragraph (a)(ii) of this section if, after evaluation of currently available technology the director determines that it is technically impracticable to meet a standard at a specific site. A remedy that employs alternate standards established by the director under this subsection shall meet the requirements of this subsection and paragraphs (a)(i), (iii) and (iv) of this section. The technical impracticability determination shall include evaluation of the cost of remedy alternatives, including but not limited to, substantial and disproportionately high costs, present worth of construction, operation and maintenance costs, continued operational costs of the remedy selected and costs of any proposed alternative remedy strategies. Whenever the director sets an alternate standard, the director shall select a remedy capable of meeting the alternate standard and which is technically practicable, controls any sources of contamination to the extent technically practicable, and controls human and environmental exposures to contaminated air, soil or water. The director may establish alternate standards for soil or water under this subsection only if the owner has or obtains rights to control human or environmental exposures to contaminated media, and consents to impose such controls as are required to protect human health and the environment. Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a)(i) of this section, or W.S.

35-11-1609

such controls may be imposed by the owner without the site receiving a use control area designation under W.S.

35-11-1609

. The standards of paragraph (a)(ii) of this section must be met if the owner or operator applies to remove the use restrictions applicable to the site or to receive a no further action letter under W.S.

35-11-1608

.

When establishing standards under paragraph (a)(ii) or subsection (c) or (d) of this section, the director shall specify one (1) or more points of compliance where standards must be achieved. In specifying a point of compliance, the director shall consider the following factors:

Compliance with groundwater standards shall be monitored as close as reasonably practical to the contaminant source or site boundary or boundary of the use control area. The director shall select any groundwater point of compliance based upon the evaluation of the properties of the aquifer, the proximity of existing and reasonably anticipated points of groundwater withdrawal or discharge to the surface, the location of the contaminant plume relative to the site or use control area boundary, the toxicity of the contaminant, the presence and proximity of multiple contaminant sources, the exposure and likelihood of actual exposure to contaminated groundwater, and the technical practicability of groundwater remediation;

For soils, standards shall be met at locations determined to ensure protection of human health and identified environmental receptors, and protection of surface water, groundwater and air resulting from any potential transfer of contaminants from soils to these other media; and

For surface water, standards shall be met at the point where any release enters any surface water of the state consistent with applicable federal and state requirements. If sediments are affected by releases to surface water, a sediment point of compliance may also be established.

Remediation standards for a site that has become contaminated by a release or migration of contamination from a source not located on the site shall be appropriate for any use control area designation applicable to such site, or if desired by the owner the remediation requirements shall be adequate to restore the site to all uses for which it was suitable prior to the contamination.

The department may establish supplemental requirements for owners or operators of lands or facilities subject to permitting or corrective action requirements of the hazardous waste rules and regulations promulgated under W.S. 35-11-503(d) as may be necessary to ensure that such sites are characterized and remediated in a manner which is consistent with, equivalent to, and no less stringent [than] permitting, closure, post-closure and corrective action requirements contained in rules and regulations adopted by the United States Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) under authority of subtitle C of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, 42 U.S.C. § 6901, et seq. Election by an eligible site owner or operator who is subject to such hazardous waste permitting or corrective action requirements to participate in the voluntary remediation program under this article shall not relieve the owner or operator of the duty to comply with all requirements of the hazardous waste rules and regulations promulgated under W.S. 35-11-503(d).

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 13, § 1; 2001, ch. 59, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

§ 35-11-1606.
Preliminary remediation agreement; contents.

The preliminary remediation agreement shall contain the terms and conditions agreed to by the parties, which shall include the information and procedures required for completion of an environmental assessment or site characterization that is adequate and appropriate to support selection of a permanent or long term protective remedy for the site and adjacent property to meet the standards in W.S.

35-11-1605

, and a work plan, schedule and statement of any criteria the department intends to use to evaluate work plans and reports.

For any site that is determined by the director to have the potential for significant contamination, be located in an area where human exposures to contaminants are likely, or require evaluation of remedial alternatives as a condition for the state to maintain primacy in any federal program, the director shall require the site characterization plan within the preliminary remediation agreement under this section to include a description of alternative remedial actions to be evaluated and a plan for the collection of any data and site information needed to evaluate those alternative remedial actions. Not all potential remedies must be evaluated for a site. The director and the owner may enter into a single agreement containing both characterization and alternative remedial action evaluation plans, or may enter into an alternative remedial action evaluation agreement following completion of site characterization.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 13, § 1.

§ 35-11-1607.
Remedy agreement; prerequisite; contents; violation of agreement; changes to agreement; covenant not to sue; certificate of completion; recording; effect on orders or permits.

Except as provided in W.S. 35-11-1605(d), before an owner and the department may enter into a remedy agreement that includes long-term restrictions on the use of the site, the owner must obtain a use control area designation for the site as set forth in W.S.

35-11-1609

. The use restrictions contained in any use control area designation may be used by the director to establish any alternate soil standard as provided in W.S. 35-11-1605(c).

Any remedy agreement shall contain:

A remedial action plan, including the remediation standards and objectives for the site or use control area, the remediation standards and objectives for adjacent property, a description of any engineering or institutional control, a schedule for the required remediation activities, and conditions for the effective and efficient implementation of the remedy agreement. The department shall require a suitable bond or other evidence of financial assurance to assure the performance and maintenance of engineering controls and any monitoring activities required in a remedy agreement; and

The reopeners or termination clauses set forth in W.S.

35-11-1610

.

The remedy and remediation standards for a site that are set forth in a remedy agreement shall be permanent, subject to the reopeners and termination clauses in W.S.

35-11-1610

.

Use restrictions, or other terms or conditions set forth in a remedy agreement shall run with the land and be binding upon successors in interest. If a term or condition of any remedy agreement, covenant not to sue, or certificate of completion requires the maintenance of a bond or other evidence of financial assurance, it shall be the duty of any successor in interest to maintain such bond or financial assurance.

A violation of any use restriction, term or condition of a remedy agreement or certificate of completion shall be deemed a violation of this act, and the department may bring any action for such violation against the owner of the site at the time the violation occurs or against the person who violates the use restriction, term or condition of the remedy agreement or certificate of completion.

No person shall change any engineering or institutional controls contained in a remedy agreement or certificate of completion without the prior written consent of the department. Before a change may be made, the department shall review the contamination at the site and any new requirements shall be incorporated into a subsequent remedy agreement or certificate of completion. Upon entry into a subsequent remedy agreement or certificate of completion or issuance of a no further action letter, the director shall modify or terminate any prior remedy agreement or certificate of completion.

Consistent with the reopeners and termination clauses in W.S.

35-11-1610

, the department shall, upon request, provide the owner or prospective purchaser a covenant not to sue. Any covenant not to sue shall extend to subsequent owners.

If the director determines that all remediation requirements for a site have been successfully implemented or satisfied, the department shall, upon request, provide the owner or prospective purchaser a certificate of completion.

A person who receives a remedy agreement or certificate of completion under this section shall record a copy in the office of the county clerk with the deed for the site and shall file the copy in the office of the county clerk no later than ten (10) business days after the date the remedy agreement or certification of completion is signed.

No remedy agreement for any site subject to a prior administrative or judicial order or permit which contains remedial requirements shall be effective until the order or permit has been modified to incorporate the terms of the remedy agreement. Modifications to orders or permits under this subsection shall be made using the procedures specified in the prior order or permit. Entry into a remedy agreement under this article shall not affect the duty of the site owner or operator to comply with any prior order or permit. Following modification of the order or permit as provided in this subsection, the owner shall comply with the modified order or permit.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 13, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

§ 35-11-1608.
No further action letters; findings; natural attenuation.

If the department determines that no further remediation is required on a site, the department shall, upon request, provide the owner or prospective purchaser a no further action letter, subject to reopener or termination as provided in W.S.

35-11-1610

. The department may only issue a no further action letter upon a finding by the department that the site does not require engineering or institutional controls or use restrictions to meet the standards specified in W.S. 35-11-1605(a)(ii).

When the department has determined that monitored natural attenuation over a reasonable period of time is appropriate and that no exposure to contaminated media is reasonably expected during the period of natural attenuation, the department shall, upon request, provide the owner or prospective purchaser a no further action letter. The no further action letter may require that the current use of the property continue during the period of natural attenuation and also may require that testing be conducted to confirm that standards are met.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 13, § 1; 2001, ch. 59, § 1.

§ 35-11-1609.
Use control areas; when establishment required; procedure; contents of petition; notice; failure of governmental entity to act; enforcement; exception.

The owner of a site who proposes long-term restrictions on the use of the site shall petition to the appropriate governmental entity or entities for the creation of a use control area to establish long-term restrictions on the use of the site.

A use control area may be created or modified only upon the petition of the owner of a site, and notice and public hearing as provided in subsection (d) of this section, and shall include only the site, unless adjacent property owners consent.

The petition to establish a use control area shall contain data, information and any remedy options required in a preliminary remediation agreement under W.S.

35-11-1606

.

Upon submission of a petition for long term use restrictions, the governmental entity to whom the use area designation petition has been submitted shall cause the owner to give written notice of the petition to all surface owners of record of land contiguous to the site, and to publish notice of the petition and a public hearing once per week for four (4) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the site is located. The notice shall identify the property, generally describe the petition and proposed use restrictions, direct that comments may be submitted to the governmental entity or entities to whom the petition has been submitted, and provide the date, time and place of a public hearing. The public hearing shall be held no sooner than thirty (30) days after the first publication of the notice. After the public hearing has been held, the governing board, commission or council shall vote upon the creation of the use control area in accordance with applicable rules, regulations and procedures. No use control area shall be created except upon petition of the owner and a majority vote of the appropriate board, commission or council.

The governmental entity to whom the use control area petition has been submitted shall approve or deny an owner’s petition for a use control area within one hundred eighty (180) days after the petition is received. The owner and a governmental entity may agree to extend the time period in which the governmental entity is to vote upon the petition. The governmental entity may, on a vote taken within one hundred eighty (180) days after the petition is received, condition its vote approving the petition upon the owner’s subsequent filing of the determination by the director that a remedy can be selected that meets the requirements of W.S.

35-11-1605

and is consistent with owner’s petition.

The restrictions in a use control area are enforceable by the issuing governmental entity by injunction, mandamus or abatement, in addition to any other remedies provided by law.

Except as provided in subsection (e), nothing in this section shall contravene or limit the authority of any county, city or town to regulate and control the property under their jurisdiction.

The department shall not have the authority to require a governmental entity to adopt any zoning regulation or restriction applicable to a site as part of a remediation or response action or a remedy agreement.

If the department has issued a no further action letter under W.S.

35-11-1608

, then no use control area designation shall be required.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 13, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 35-11-1610.
Reopening or termination of remedy agreements, covenants not to sue, certificates of completion or no further action determinations; conditions; recording.

The department may reopen a remedy agreement, covenant not to sue or certificate of completion at any time if:

The current owner fails substantially to comply with the terms and conditions of the remedy agreement, covenant not to sue or certificate of completion;

An imminent and substantial endangerment to human health or the environment is discovered;

Contamination is discovered that was present on the site but was not known to the owner or the department on the date of the remedy agreement or when the department issued a covenant not to sue or certificate of completion; or

The remedy fails to meet the remediation objectives that are contained in the remedy agreement or certificate of completion.

The department may reopen a no further action determination at any time if:

An imminent and substantial endangerment to human health or the environment is discovered; or

The department determines that the monitored natural attenuation remedy under W.S. 35-11-1608(b) is not effective in meeting the standards for a no further action letter under this section.

The department may terminate a remedy agreement, covenant not to sue, certificate of completion or no further action letter if it is discovered that any of these instruments were based on fraud, material misrepresentation or failure to disclose material information, or if an owner’s willful violation of any use restriction results in harmful exposures of any toxic contaminant to any user or occupant of the site.

If a remedy agreement, covenant not to sue, certificate of completion or no further action letter is reopened or terminated, the department shall record a notice of such action in the office of the county clerk with the deed for the site and shall file the notice in the office of the county clerk no later than ten (10) business days after the date of the remedy agreement, covenant not to sue, certificate of completion or no further action letter is reopened or terminated.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 13, § 1.

§ 35-11-1611.
Disputes; appeal.

If a person and the department are unable after good faith efforts to resolve a dispute arising under this article pursuant to the provisions of an agreement, the person may appeal the department’s decision to the council.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 13, § 1.

§ 35-11-1612.
Fees; notice; appeal.

The department shall implement a fee system and schedule of fees which are applicable to the preliminary remediation agreements, remedy agreements, certificates of completion and no further action letters authorized under this article. Fees shall cover all reasonable direct and indirect costs of the department’s participation in any activity authorized by this article. The department shall give written notice of the amount of the fee assessment. The owner of the eligible site may appeal the assessment to the council within forty-five (45) days of receipt.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 13, § 1.

§ 35-11-1613.
Remediation requirements for nonvoluntary sites.

The remediation requirements for sites that do not participate in the voluntary remediation program in W.S.

35-11-1601

through

35-11-1612

may include, in the discretion of the director requirements which:

Return contaminated soil and water to background contaminant levels;

Return contaminated soil to contaminant levels that are safe for any potential future use of the site;

Return contaminated groundwater to contaminant levels that ensure that the class of use of groundwater prior to the release is restored, or if not technically practicable, employs the best available groundwater remediation technology. No liability release shall be provided to the owner until the owner demonstrates that groundwater standards have been met;

Remove all continuing sources of soil or water contamination; and

Eliminate to the extent practical any continuing risk to any ecological receptor present at or near the site.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 13, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.